Hawaii statutes.
[§328-122] Responsible persons.
Wholesale distributors shall establish and maintain current lists of officers,
directors, managers, and other persons in charge of the wholesale distribution,
storage, and handling of prescription drugs, including a description of each
person's duties and a summary of each person's qualifications. [L 1992, c 196,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next